Tennessee, session 114, SB2165.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-1-113(e), is amended by
redesignating the current language as subdivision (e)(1) and adding the following new
subdivision:
(2) If the child who is the subject of the petition is in the legal custody or
guardianship of the department, then the department must provide a copy of the petition
to the foster parent of the child, if the foster parent has served as the physical placement
for the child for a period of nine (9) or more consecutive months. If the department is the
petitioner, then the department must provide the required copy within seven (7) days of
the filing of the petition. If another party is the petitioner, then the department must
provide the required copy within seven (7) days of service upon the department.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-2-415(a)(15), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting the following:
(15) The department shall provide all information regarding the child and the
child's family background and health history, in a timely manner to the foster parent or
parents. The foster parent or parents shall receive additional or necessary information,
that is relevant to the care of the child, on an ongoing basis; provided, that confidential
information received by the foster parents, including the copy of any termination of
parental rights petition provided pursuant to § 36-1-113(e)(2), shall be maintained as
SB2165
012318
- 1 -

such by the foster parents, except as necessary to promote or protect the health and
welfare of the child.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012318